Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-206
Research and extension center west of 102nd meridian; purpose; management.

For the furtherance and promotion of agricultural, horticultural, and forestry interests of this state, a research and extension center shall be established west of the one hundred second meridian in Nebraska, which center shall be under the control and management of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 1, p. 502;

R.S.1913, § 7138;

C.S.1922, § 6788;

C.S.1929, § 85-204;

R.S.1943, § 85-206;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 76.